Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-406
Code; applicability.

This code shall be applicable in all places where military forces are present with any personnel who are on orders to be in the active service of the state.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 6, p. 1555.